Arkansas, session 2025, SB568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(61) and (62), concerning the
enumeration of special revenues, are amended to read as follows:
(61) Brine taxes imposed upon all brine produced in the state
for the purpose of bromine or lithium extraction, as enacted by Acts 1979,
No. 759, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 26-58-301;
(62) Oil and Gas Commission fees, including oil assessments, gas
assessments in excess of four and one-half (4½) mills each fiscal year until
*JLL284*
04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 SB568
July 1, 2023, under § 15-71-107(b)(2)(A)(i), drilling permits, permits for
plugging wells, and permits for each salt water well, all as enacted by Acts
1939, No. 105, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 15-71-101 — 15-71-112, 15-
72-101 — 15-72-110, 15-72-205, 15-72-212, 15-72-216, 15-72-301 — 15-72-324,
and 15-72-401 — 15-72-407, and the portion of taxes levied on salt water used
in bromine or lithium production, as enacted by Acts 1947, No. 136, and all
laws amendatory thereto, § 26-58-111(9);

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-51-506(b)(15), concerning the
definitions to be used with respect to the income tax credit for waste
reduction, reuse, or recycling equipment, is amended to read as follows:
(15) “Solid waste” means all putrescible and nonputrescible
wastes in solid or semisolid form, including, but not limited to, yard or
food waste, waste glass, waste metals, waste plastics, wastepapers, waste
paperboard, electronic waste, lithium-ion battery cells and battery packs,
and all other solid or semisolid wastes resulting from industrial,
commercial, agricultural, community, and residential activities;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Lithium resources development — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Direct compensation" means wages, salaries, bonuses, and
commissions;
(2) "Eligible facility costs" means expenditures for the
development, acquisition, construction, expansion, renovation, refurbishment,
maintenance, and operation of a qualified facility, including without
limitation costs incurred for land, buildings, site improvements, permitting,
facility lease payments, site characterization and assessment, engineering,
and design used directly and exclusively for a qualified facility;
(3) "Facility" means a tract or adjacent tracts of land in the
state and any structures and tangible personal property contained on the land
that are for the operation of a lithium, cathode, anode, lithium battery, and
grid storage facility or are directly engaged in the processing, refining,
conversion, manufacturing, and recycling of lithium or lithium products;
(4) "Indirect compensation" means actual costs incurred for:
04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 SB568
(A) Health, life, and disability insurance coverage;
(B) Retirement benefits, including without limitation
pensions, annuities, and matching retirement fund contributions; and
(C) Moving, relocation, and housing benefits;
(5)(A) "Lithium, cathode, anode, lithium battery, and grid
storage facility equipment" means equipment and related services whether
purchased or leased for immediate use or stored for future use in this state
and other enabling machinery, equipment, software, and hardware purchased or
leased for the further processing, development, refinement, conversion,
manufacturing, or recycling of lithium, cathode, anode, lithium battery, and
grid storage products.
(B) "Lithium, cathode, anode, lithium battery, and grid
storage facility equipment" includes without limitation:
(i) Equipment and materials used for:
(a) The direct processing, refining,
conversion, manufacturing, or recycling of lithium or lithium products,
including without limitation lithium hydroxide and lithium carbonate;
(b) The development or manufacturing of
cathode facilities and cathode active materials, anode facilities and anode
active materials, grid storage facilities and electrolytes, separator
facilities, or lithium battery recycling facilities;
(c) Equipment and input materials used in the
operation of a qualified facility, including without limitation a component
part, installation, refreshment, replacement, or upgrade of a qualified
facility whether or not the property is affixed to or incorporated into real
property;
(d) Equipment necessary for the
transformation, generation, distribution, storage, or management of
electricity that is required to operate equipment of a qualified facility,
including without limitation any substation, generator, uninterruptible
energy equipment, supply, conduit, fuel piping and storage, cabling, duct
bank, switch, switchboard, battery bank or energy storage system, testing
equipment, and backup generator; and
(e) Water conservation systems, including
without limitation a mechanism that is designed to collect, conserve, and
reuse water; and
04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 SB568
(ii) Labor services to install, repair, service,
alter, fabricate, or maintain equipment and materials described in
subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) of this section;
(6) "Qualified facility" means one (1) or more facilities,
including any addition to or expansion of a facility, owned or operated by a
qualified firm that:
(A) Creates a qualified investment of at least one hundred
million dollars ($100,000,000) within the state no later than ten (10) years
after the start of construction of the facility;
(B) Annually pays total direct compensation and indirect
compensation of at least three million dollars ($3,000,000) to employees
within the state over the two (2) calendar years following the calendar year
in which the facility commences operations; and
(C) Has received a positive cost-benefit analysis from the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission for the facility;
(7) "Qualified firm" means a for-profit business establishment
that is:
(A) Subject to state income, sales, and property taxes;
(B) The owner or operator of a facility;
(C) Engaged in developing lithium, cathode, anode, lithium
battery, and grid storage facility equipment; and
(8) "Qualified investment" means, with respect to a qualified
facility, the aggregate, nonduplicative, eligible facility costs expended by
a qualified firm in the state.
(b)(1) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the purchase
or sale of the following are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by
this chapter and the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating
Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq.:
(A) Lithium, cathode, anode, lithium battery, and grid storage
facility equipment;
(B) Services purchased for the purpose of and in conjunction
with developing, acquiring, constructing, expanding, renovating,
refurbishing, and operating a qualified facility;
(C) Electricity used by a qualified facility; and
(D) Equipment, materials, and products for the further
processing of materials used in manufacturing lithium, cathode, anode,
04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 SB568
lithium battery, and grid storage facility equipment in the state.
(2) Equipment, materials, products, land, and services
purchased, leased, or rented for the extraction of salt water are
specifically excluded from the exemption provided under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section.
(c)(1) To claim the exemption provided under this section, a qualified
firm shall submit an application for a qualified facility to the Department
of Finance and Administration.
(2) A qualified firm is eligible for the exemption provided
under this section upon the creation of a minimum qualified investment of at
least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), if the qualified investment
is created no later than ten (10) years after the start of construction of
the qualified facility that is the subject of the application submitted under
this subsection.
(3)(A) Within thirty (30) days after receiving a completed
application under this subsection, the department shall grant or deny the
application in whole or in part.
(B) If an application submitted under this subsection is
denied as incomplete and the qualified firm submitting the application
provides the additional information or documentation required by the
department or otherwise completes its application within thirty (30) days of
the notice of denial, the application shall be considered completed as of the
original date of submission.
(C) If an application submitted under this subsection is
denied as incomplete and the qualified firm submitting the application fails
to provide the information or documentation required by the department or
complete its application within thirty (30) days of the notice of denial, the
application shall remain denied and may be resubmitted in full with a new
submission date.
(D) If an application submitted under this subsection is
complete and meets the requirements of this section, the department shall
approve the application and certify that the qualified facility is eligible
for the exemption provided under this section.
(4) Once an application is approved under this subsection:
(A) The department shall transmit an approved financial
incentive certificate to the qualified firm; and
04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 SB568
(B) The exemption provided under this section may be
claimed by the qualified facility.
(d) Upon confirmation that the minimum qualified investment required
under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this section has been met, the department
shall issue a rebate to the qualified firm for any state sales or use tax
paid on the eligible facility costs used to determine the minimum qualified
investment.
(e) After receiving an approved financial incentive certificate from
the department under subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section, a qualified firm
shall certify annually, for each calendar year in which the qualified firm is
subject to the compensation requirement provided in subdivision (a)(6)(B) of
this section, the aggregate annualized compensation at the qualified facility
for the calendar year.
(f) An approved financial incentive certificate transmitted under
subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section shall be revoked if:
(1) The qualified facility ceases operations within ten (10)
years of the commencement of construction;
(2) The qualified facility fails to meet the qualified
investment requirement under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this section; or
(3) The aggregate annualized compensation of a qualified
facility falls below the required aggregate compensation stated in
subdivision (a)(6)(B) of this section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-58-111(9), concerning the rate of the
severance tax, is amended to read as follows:
(9) On salt water whose naturally dissolved components, or
solutes, are used as source raw materials for bromine, lithium, and other
products derived from the same salt water used in the bromine or lithium
production, two dollars and forty-five cents ($2.45) per one thousand (1,000)
barrels, forty-two thousand United States gallons (42,000 U.S. gals.); and

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-58-124(a), concerning distribution of
the severance tax, is amended to read as follows:
(a) All taxes, penalties, and costs collected by the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of this
subchapter, except for the taxes, penalties, and costs collected on natural
04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 SB568
gas and salt water, shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit
of the State Apportionment Fund.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-58-124, concerning distribution of the
severance tax, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(d) All taxes, penalties, and costs collected by the secretary on salt
water shall be deposited into the State Treasury as follows:
(1) The Treasurer of State shall allocate the first three
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($325,000) collected each fiscal year in
the following manner on or before the fifth of the month next following the
month during which funds under this subsection are received by the Treasurer
of State:
(A) Forty-five cents (45¢) of the fee levied per one
thousand (1,000) barrels shall be deposited and credited as provided in § 26-
58-125; and
(B) Of the amount remaining after the allocation under
subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section:
(i) Three percent (3%) shall be allocated to the
General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund to be used for
defraying the necessary expenses of the state government; and
(ii) Ninety-seven percent (97%) shall be allocated
as follows:
(a) Seventy-five percent (75%) shall be
general revenues and shall be allocated to the various State Treasury funds
participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as
provided by and to be used for the respective purposes set forth in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.; and
(b) Twenty-five percent (25%) shall be special
revenues and shall be allocated to the County Aid Fund; and
(2) The Treasurer of State shall allocate funds collected each
fiscal year in excess of three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) in the following manner on or before the fifth of the month next
following the month during which funds under this subsection are received by
the Treasurer of State:
(A) Forty-five cents (45¢) of the fee levied per one
thousand (1,000) barrels shall be deposited and credited as provided in § 26-
04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 SB568
58-125; and
(B) Of the amount remaining after the allocation under
subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section:
(i) Three percent (3%) shall be allocated to the
General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund to be used for
defraying the necessary expenses of the state government; and
(ii)(a) Ninety-seven percent (97%) shall be special
revenues and shall be allocated to the County Aid Fund.
(b) On or before the tenth of the month
following the end of each calendar quarter, the Treasurer of State shall
remit by state warrants to the various county treasurers all funds under
subdivision (d)(2)(B)(ii)(a) of this section then received by him or her
during the quarterly period and transferred to the County Aid Fund in the
proportions of the funds as between the respective counties that, as
certified by the secretary to the Treasurer of State, the salt water
severance tax produced from each respective county bears to the total of the
taxes produced from all counties.
(c) Upon receipt of any taxes under
subdivision (d)(2)(B)(ii)(b) of this section, each county treasurer shall
credit the entire amount to the county road fund for use for the same
purposes as other moneys credited to the county road fund.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-58-301(b)(1), concerning the tax levied for
the benefit of the Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources Fund, is amended to
read as follows:
(b)(1) There is levied upon all brine produced in the state for the
purpose of bromine or lithium extraction a tax of twenty cents (20¢) per one
thousand (1,000) barrels.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-58-302(b)(1), concerning the additional
tax levied for the benefit of the Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources Fund,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) There is levied a tax of ten cents (10¢) per one thousand
(1,000) barrels on all brine produced in this state for the purpose of
bromine or lithium extraction.

04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 SB568
SECTION 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-8 of this act are effective on
and after October 1, 2025.

/s/Crowell
































04-09-2025 13:43:52 JLL284